Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 12.8 Water Projects Revolving Loan Fund

46-12.8-1.
Legislative findings.

It is hereby found that there exists and will in the future exist within the state of Rhode Island the need to construct and reconstruct facilities related to and acquire watershed protection land in connection with the provision of safe drinking water throughout the state of Rhode Island.

It is hereby further found that to provide financial assistance for the acquisition, design, planning, construction, enlargement, repair, protection or improvement of public drinking water supplies or treatment facilities, including any of those actions required under the federal Safe Drinking Water Act of 1974, 42 U.S.C., §§ 300f — 300j-9, including the Safe Drinking Water Act (SDWA) amendments of 1996 (Pub. L. No. 104-182) and any amendments thereto, it is necessary to establish a revolving loan fund program to provide a perpetual source of low cost financing for safe drinking water projects.

It is hereby further found that to secure maximum benefit to the state from a safe drinking water revolving loan fund, it is necessary to place such fund within the jurisdiction and control of the Rhode Island infrastructure bank, which agency presently runs the state’s revolving fund with respect to the state’s wastewater pollution abatement program, which agency shall exclusively administer the financing portion of the safe drinking water revolving loan fund, but which shall nevertheless work, as necessary, with the department of environmental management, the water resources board, the Rhode Island department of health, the division of public utilities and carriers and any other agency or instrumentality of the state or federal government with responsibility for the development or supervision of water supply facilities within the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 313, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 396, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 328, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 44; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 14, § 19.

46-12.8-2.
Definitions.

“Agency” means the Rhode Island infrastructure bank.

“Approved project” means any project or portion thereof of a governmental unit or privately organized water supplier that has been issued a certificate of approval by the department for assistance through the agency; and, notwithstanding the foregoing, shall include safe drinking water projects funded outside of the drinking water state revolving fund without the requirement of the issuance of a certificate of approval.

“Department” means the department of health.

“Local governmental obligations” means bonds, notes or other evidences of indebtedness in fully marketable form issued by a governmental unit to evidence a loan from the agency in accordance with this chapter or otherwise as provided herein.

“Local governmental unit” means any town, city, district, commission, agency, authority, board of other political subdivision or instrumentality of the state or of any political subdivision thereof responsible for the ownership or operation of water supply facilities within the state.

“Obligations of private water companies” means bonds, notes or other evidences of indebtedness, of private water companies, in fully marketable form.

“Privately organized water supplier” means any water company not owned or operated by a local governmental unit, existing under the laws of the state, and in the business of operating a safe drinking water facility.

“Water supply facility or facilities” means water reservoirs, wells and well sites, transmission or distribution system, any and all real estate or interests in real estate held in connection therewith, all equipment and improvements held in connection therewith, and any property or interests therein, real, personal or mixed, used or held on to be used in connection therewith.

“Financial assistance” means any form of financial assistance other than grants provided by the agency to a local governmental unit or private water company in accordance with this chapter for all or any part of the cost of an approved project, including, without limitation, temporary and permanent loans, with or without interest, grants, guarantees, insurance, subsidies for the payment of debt service on loans, lines of credit, and similar forms of financial assistance; provided, however, notwithstanding the foregoing, for purposes of capitalization grant awards made available to the agency pursuant to the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 (Pub. L. No. 111-5), or as otherwise required in connection with other capitalization grant awards made available to the agency, financial assistance shall also include principal forgiveness and negative interest loans.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 313, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 396, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 5, art. 3, § 2; P.L. 2010, ch. 179, § 2; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 14, § 19.

46-12.8-3.
Additional powers of agency in connection with administration of safe drinking water revolving fund.

The agency shall have all powers necessary or convenient to carry out and effectuate the purposes and provisions of this chapter, including, so far as apt, the general powers of the agency as set forth in chapter 12.2 of this title and, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the powers:

To receive and apply its revenues to the purposes of this chapter without appropriation or allotment by the state or any political subdivision thereof;

To borrow money, issue bonds, notes or other evidences of indebtedness, and apply the proceeds thereof, as provided in this chapter, and to pledge or assign or create security interests in revenues, funds, and other property of the agency and otherwise as provided in this chapter, to pay or secure any such bonds, notes or other evidences of indebtedness; and to invest any funds held in reserves or in the safe drinking water revolving loan fund or any revenues or funds not required for immediate disbursement, in such investments as may be legal investments for funds of the state;

To obtain insurance and to enter into agreements of indemnification necessary or convenient to the exercise of powers under this chapter;

To enter into contracts, arrangements and agreements with other persons, and execute and deliver all instruments necessary or convenient to the exercise of its powers under this chapter; such contracts and agreements may include without limitation, loan agreements with local governmental units and private water companies, operating plans and other agreements contemplated by this chapter, grant agreements, contracts for financial assistance or other forms of assistance from the state or the United States, and trust agreements and other financing agreements and instruments pertaining to any bonds, notes or other evidences of indebtedness issued in accordance with the provisions of this chapter;

To provide financial assistance to local governmental units and private water companies to finance costs of approved projects, and to acquire and hold local governmental obligations and the obligations of private water companies at such prices and in such manner as the agency shall deem advisable, and sell local governmental obligations and the obligations of private water companies acquired or held by it at prices without relation to cost and in such manner as the agency shall deem advisable, and to secure its own bonds, notes or other evidences of indebtedness with such obligations, all as provided in this chapter;

To acquire, own, lease as tenant, or hold real, personal or mixed property or any interest therein for its own office; and to improve, rehabilitate, sell, assign, exchange, lease as landlord, mortgage or otherwise dispose of or encumber the property; and

To do all things necessary or convenient or desirable for carrying out the purpose of this chapter or the powers expressly granted or necessarily implied by this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 313, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 396, § 1.

46-12.8-4.
Establishment of safe drinking water revolving loan fund, sources of funds, permitted uses.

The agency shall be the instrumentality of the state for administration of the safe drinking water revolving loan fund, and such other funds it holds or for which it is responsible, and, in conjunction with the department, is empowered to and shall take all action necessary or appropriate to secure to the state the benefits of any other federal or state legislation pertaining to the funds and to the financing of approved projects. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing and other powers of the agency provided in this chapter, the agency is empowered to and shall:

Cooperate with any appropriate federal agencies in all matters related to administration of the safe drinking water revolving loan fund and, pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, administer the fund and receive and disburse such funds from any such agencies and from the state as may be available for the purpose of the safe drinking water revolving loan fund.

In cooperation with the department, prepare and submit to any appropriate federal agencies, the department and the governor, annual and other reports and audits required by law.

Subject to the provisions of this chapter, make, and enter into binding commitments to provide financial assistance to local governmental units and private water companies from amounts on deposit in the safe drinking water revolving loan fund and from other funds of the agency.

Establish and maintain fiscal controls and accounting procedures conforming to generally accepted government accounting standards sufficient to ensure proper accounting for receipts and disbursements from the safe drinking water revolving loan fund and other funds it holds or for which it is responsible and, with the approval of the department, adopt such rules, regulations, procedures, and guidelines which it deems necessary to assure that local governmental units and private water companies administer and maintain approved project accounts and other funds and accounts relating to financial assistance in accordance with generally accepted government accounting standards.

The agency shall establish and set up on its books a special fund, designated the safe drinking water revolving loan fund, to be held in trust and to be administered by the agency solely as provided in this chapter and in any trust agreement securing bonds of the agency issued under the chapter. The agency shall credit to the safe drinking water revolving loan fund or one or more accounts therein:

All amounts appropriated or designated to the agency by the state or federal government for purposes of the fund;

All loan repayments and other payments received by the agency on any loans, local governmental obligations and the obligations of private water companies;

All investment earnings on amounts credited to the fund;

All sums collected as water quality protection charges as provided in chapter 15.3 of this title;

All sums paid to the water development fund established pursuant to chapter 15.1 of this title;

All proceeds of bonds of the agency issued under this chapter to the extent required by any trust agreement for such bonds;

All other monies which are specifically designated for this fund, including, amounts from gifts, bequests, administrative, civil and criminal penalties, or other funds from any public or private sources; and

Any other amounts required by the provisions of this chapter, or any other law or by any trust agreement pertaining to bonds to be credited to the fund or which the agency in its discretion shall determine to credit thereto.

Except to the extent limited by law, and subject to the provisions of this chapter, and to any agreements with the holders of any bonds of the agency or any trustee therefor, amounts held by the agency for the account of the safe drinking water revolving loan fund shall be applied by the agency, either by direct expenditure, disbursement, or transfer to one or more other funds and accounts held by the agency or maintained under any trust agreement pertaining to bonds, either alone or with other funds of the agency, to the following purposes:

To provide financial assistance to local governmental units and to private water companies to finance costs of approved projects, and to refinance the costs of such projects, subject to terms and conditions, if any, as are determined by the department;

To purchase or refinance debt obligations of the local governmental units and private water companies, or to provide guarantees, insurance or similar forms of financial assistance for such obligations;

To fund reserves for bonds of the agency and to purchase insurance and pay the premiums therefor, and pay fees and expenses of letters or lines of credit and costs of reimbursement to the issuers thereof for any payments made thereon or on any insurance, and to otherwise provide security for, and a source of payment for, by pledge, lien, assignment, or otherwise bonds of the agency issued in accordance with this chapter; and

To pay expenses of the agency and the department in administering the fund and the financial assistance programs of the agency authorized by this chapter. As part of the annual appropriations bill, the department shall set forth the gross amount of expenses received from the agency and a complete, specific breakdown of the sums retained and/or expended for administrative expenses.

By way of illustration, not by limitation, in the personnel area, the breakdown of administrative expenses should contain the number of personnel paid, the position numbers of the personnel, and whether or not the position is a new position or a position which had been funded previously by federal funds or a position which had been previously created but unfunded.

Subject to any express limitation of this chapter pertaining to expenditure or disbursement of funds or accounts held by the agency, funds or accounts held by the agency may be transferred to any other fund or account held by the agency for the purposes of this chapter and expended or disbursed for purposes permitted by such fund or account.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 313, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 396, § 1.

46-12.8-5.
Procedure for application, approval, and award of financial assistance.

Any local governmental unit or privately organized water supplier may apply to the agency for financial assistance in accordance with this chapter to finance all or any part of the cost of an approved project. The agency shall not award financial assistance to such local government unit or privately organized water supplier hereunder until and unless the department shall have issued a certificate of approval of the project or portion thereof for which such financial assistance has been sought. Notwithstanding the foregoing, for safe drinking water projects funded outside of the drinking water state revolving fund, the Agency may provide financial assistance without the requirement of the issuance of a certificate of approval.

If the department shall determine, in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter, that an application for financial assistance or portion thereof shall be approved, it shall deliver to the agency a certificate of approval of the project or a portion thereof which shall specify the project or portion thereof eligible for financial assistance and such other terms, conditions and limitations with respect to the construction and operation of the project as the department shall determine. The agency shall specify, among other things, the type and amount of financial assistance to be provided from the safe drinking water revolving loan fund, the amount, if any, of subsidy assistance to be granted, the amount, if any, of other financial assistance permitted by this chapter to be provided, and such other terms, conditions, and limitations on the financial assistance, the expenditure of loan proceeds, and the construction and operation of the project as the agency shall determine or approve.

In addition to the authority provided by law, the department shall be responsible for, and shall have all requisite power to, review and approve reports and plans for safe drinking water projects and approved projects, or any part thereof, for which financial assistance has been applied or granted in accordance with this chapter from the safe drinking water revolving fund, to enter into contracts with local governmental units and private water companies relative to approved projects, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the costs of approved projects eligible for financial assistance, grants, and other terms, conditions and limitations with respect to the construction and operation of the project, and to inspect the construction and operation of approved projects in compliance with approved plans. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, in connection with the exercise of its powers and performance of its duties under this chapter, the department shall have all the powers provided by law to the department and its director. The department shall adopt rules, regulations, procedures, and guidelines to carry out the purposes of this chapter and for the proper administration of its powers and duties under this chapter. The rules, regulations, procedures, and guidelines shall include among other things, criteria for determining those safe drinking water projects, to be approved for financial assistance from the safe drinking water revolving fund and specification of eligible costs of the projects. In order to provide for the expenses of the department under this chapter, the agency shall transfer to the department for application to the expenses an amount from the safe drinking water revolving loan fund equal to an amount as the agency and the department shall reasonably determine. The agency and the department shall enter into an operating agreement and amend the same, from time to time, allocating their respective rights, duties, and obligations with respect to the award of financial assistance and grants to finance approved projects under this chapter and establishing procedures for the application, approval, and oversight of projects, financial assistance, and grants.

Upon issuance of a certificate of approval, the agency shall award as soon as practicable the financial assistance from the safe drinking water revolving fund to the local governmental unit or privately organized water supplies for any approved project specified in the certificate; provided, however, the agency may decline to award any financial assistance which the agency determines will have a substantial adverse effect on the interests of holders of bonds, notes or other evidences of indebtedness of the agency or the interests of other participants in the financial assistance program, or for other good and sufficient cause affecting the finances of the agency. All financial assistance shall be made pursuant to a loan agreement between the agency and the local governmental unit or privately organized water supplier, acting by and through the officer or officers, board, committee, or other body authorized by law, or otherwise its chief executive officer, according to the terms and conditions of the certificate of approval and such other terms and conditions as may be established by the agency, and each loan shall be evidenced and secured by the issue to the agency of the local governmental obligations or obligations of the privately organized water supplier, in fully marketable form in principal amount, bearing interest at the rate or rates specified in the applicable loan agreement, and shall otherwise bear such terms and conditions as authorized by this chapter and the loan agreement.

The agency shall adopt rules, regulations, procedures, and guidelines for the proper administration of its financial assistance programs and the provision of financial assistance under this chapter. The rules, regulations, procedures, and guidelines shall be consistent with any rules, regulations, procedures, and guidelines adopted by the department, and may include, without limitation, forms of financial assistance applications, loan agreements, and other instruments, and provisions for submission to the agency and the department by a local governmental unit or a privately organized water supplier of the information regarding the proposed safe drinking water project, the distribution system of which it is a part, and the local governmental unit or privately organized water supplies as the agency or the department shall deem necessary to determine the eligibility of a project, for financial assistance under this chapter, the financial feasibility of a project, and the sufficiency of general revenues or system revenues to secure and pay the loan and the local governmental obligations or obligations of the privately organized water supplier issued to evidence the same.

In addition to other remedies of the agency under any loan agreement or otherwise provided by law, the agency may also recover from a local governmental unit or privately organized water supplier, in an action in superior court, any amount due the agency together with any other actual damages the agency shall have sustained from the failure or refusal of the local governmental unit or privately organized water supplier to make the payments.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 313, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 396, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 14, § 19.

46-12.8-6.
Authorization to expend funds available for local grants.

In addition to the financial assistance provided by the agency to local governmental units and private water companies for approved projects in accordance with this chapter, the department is hereby authorized to expend funds otherwise available for grants to local governmental units and private water companies to the extent permitted by federal and state law. The department is authorized and directed to expend funds from its portion of federal capitalization grants to conduct baseline testing of the drinking-water-supply systems of each local governmental unit responsible for the ownership or operation of water supply facilities within the state, or privately organized water suppliers, that provide drinking water to more than one municipality, for compliance with all state and federal laws, rules, and regulations pertaining to lead and copper levels in drinking water supplies. The department is further authorized and directed to expend funds from its portion of federal capitalization grants to conduct testing of water supplies at all public schools serving students from pre-K to grade 12 and state-licensed daycare facilities in the state of Rhode Island for compliance with all state and federal laws, rules, and regulations pertaining to lead and copper levels in drinking water supplies. The department shall report its findings to the speaker of the house and senate president by April 30, 2017, which report shall include a plan for ensuring compliance with all state and federal laws, rules, and regulations pertaining to lead and copper levels in drinking water supplies.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 313, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 396, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 439, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 440, § 1.

46-12.8-7.
Power of local governmental units.

Notwithstanding any provision of general law, special law or municipal charter to the contrary:

In addition to authority granted otherwise by this chapter and in any bond act or other law, a local governmental unit, acting by and through the officer or officers, board, committee, or other body authorized by law, if any, or otherwise the chief executive officer, shall have the power to:

Issue local governmental obligations as provided herein

If and to the amount authorized by a bond act or

Without limitation as to the amount, if issued as limited obligations, pursuant to §

46-12.8-9

;

Plan, design, acquire, construct, operate, maintain, and otherwise undertake any safe drinking water project subject to the rules, regulations, procedures, and guidelines of the department in effect from time to time and the requirements of any other applicable law;

Apply for, accept, and expend, financial assistance and grants for the purpose of financing costs of safe drinking water projects subject to the rules, regulations, procedures, and guidelines of the agency and the department in effect from time to time, the provisions of the applicable loan agreement, and the requirements of other applicable law;

Authorize, execute, deliver, and comply with loan agreements, trust agreements, grant agreements, and other agreements, and instruments with the agency, the department, and other persons relating to financial assistance and grants hereunder, and the issue of local governmental obligations to evidence loans, and perform the same;

Receive, apply, pledge, assign, and grant security interests in its general revenues and drinking water system revenues to secure its obligations under local governmental obligations and other financial assistance; and

Fix, revise, charge, and collect such fees, rates, rents, assessments, and other charges of general or special application for the costs and/or use of any approved project, the drinking water system of which it is a part, and any other revenue producing facilities from which the local governmental unit may derive drinking water system revenues, or for the services provided thereby, as it shall deem necessary to meet its obligations under any loan agreement or local governmental obligations outstanding or otherwise to provide for the costs and/or operation of the project and the system.

In order to provide for the collection and enforcement of fees, rates, rents, assessments, and other charges for the operation of any approved project, the drinking water system of which it is a part, and any other revenue producing facilities from which the local governmental units may derive drinking water system revenues, in addition to any other authority provided by law or any bond act applicable to a particular local governmental unit, local governmental units are hereby granted all the powers and privileges granted to them by the general laws of the state with respect to any similar fee, rate, rent, assessment, or other charge. All unpaid fees, rates, rents, assessments, and other charges shall be a lien upon the real estate served for which the unpaid fees, rates, rents, assessments, or other charges have been made. A lien shall arise and attach as of the due date of each unpaid fee, rate, rent, assessment, or other charge. The lien shall be superior to any other lien other than a tax lien, encumbrance, or interest in the real estate, whether by way of mortgage, attachment, or otherwise, except easements and restrictions. In the case of a life estate, the interest of the tenant for life shall first be liable for the unpaid fees, rates, rents, assessments, or other charges. The local governmental unit may enforce the lien by advertising and selling any real estate liable for unpaid fees, rents, assessments, and other charges in the manner provided for the enforcement of liens for unpaid taxes by chapter 9 of title 44.

Any city or town and any other local governmental unit acting by and through the officer or officers, board, committee, other body authorized by law, or otherwise the chief executive officer, may enter into agreements with the agency and the department regarding the operation of a pricing system adopted under any applicable law for the services provided by any approved project, the drinking water system of which it is a part, and any other revenue producing facilities from which the local governmental unit may derive drinking water system revenues. The agreements may include, without limitation, provisions defining the costs of services, the approved project, and the drinking water system and other facilities, and covenants or agreements, regarding the fixing and collection of fees, rates, rents, assessments and other charges for the costs and the maintenance of the pricing system at levels sufficient to pay or provide for all the costs and any payments due the agency under any loan agreement or local governmental obligations.

Any city or town and any other local governmental unit acting by and through the officer or officers, board, committee, or other body authorized by law, or otherwise the chief executive officer, may enter into agreements with the agency and the department regarding the operation of an enterprise fund established for any approved project, the drinking water system of which it is a part, and any other revenue producing facilities from which the local governmental unit may derive drinking water system revenues, and other amounts credited thereto, the establishments of reserves and other accounts and funds, and the application of any surplus funds.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 313, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 396, § 1.

46-12.8-8.
Authority of local governmental units to issue obligations — Terms.

In addition to the powers of any local governmental unit provided in any bond act, whenever a local governmental unit has applied for and accepted a loan from the agency and entered into a loan agreement therefor, any local governmental obligations issued by the local governmental unit to evidence the loan may be issued in accordance with, and subject to the limitations of this chapter, notwithstanding the provisions of the bond act authorizing the obligation or any other general or special law or provision of municipal charter to the contrary. The provisions of this chapter shall apply to the issuance of local governmental obligations issued under the authority of any bond act, whether heretofore or hereafter enacted. Notwithstanding the foregoing, no local governmental obligation shall be issued unless authorized by a vote of the body or bodies required by the charter, ordinances, or laws governing the local governmental unit, or the applicable bond act for the authorization of indebtedness of the local governmental unit.

Local governmental obligations issued by any local governmental unit shall be dated, may bear interest at such rate or rates, including rates variable, from time to time, subject to such minimum or maximum rate, if any, as may be determined by such index or other method of determination provided in the applicable loan agreement, shall mature in such amount or amounts and at such time or times, not later than the maximum dates, if any, provided herein, and may be made redeemable in whole or in part before maturity at the option of the local governmental unit or at the option of the agency, at such price or prices and under such terms and conditions as may be fixed in the loan agreement prior to the issue of the local governmental obligations. Local governmental obligations may be issued as serial bonds or term bonds or any combination thereof with such provision, if any, for sinking funds for the payment of bonds as the local governmental unit and the agency may agree. The local governmental obligations may be sold at private sale and may be in such form, payable to the bearer thereof or the registered owner, whether certificated or uncertificated, be in such denominations, payable at such place or places, within or without the state, and otherwise bear such terms and conditions not inconsistent with this chapter, as provided in the applicable loan agreement or as the agency and the local governmental unit shall otherwise agree. The local governmental obligations may be issued in principal amount equal to the loan evidenced thereby or at such discount as the agency and the local governmental unit shall agree.

Local governmental obligations shall be payable within a period not exceeding the greater of the period, if any, specified in the applicable bond act or the useful life of the approved project financed by such obligations as determined by the department, or if incurred to finance more than one project, the average useful life of the projects. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the local governmental obligations shall be payable by such equal, increasing, or decreasing installments of principal, annual or otherwise, as will extinguish the obligations at maturity, the first installment to be payable no later than one year after the date of issuance of the obligations or one year after the date of completion of the approved project financed by the obligations, as determined by the department, whichever date is later, and the remaining installments of principal, if any, to be in such amounts and payable on such dates as the agency and the local governmental unit shall agree.

If a local governmental unit has authorized borrowing in accordance with this chapter and the issuance of local governmental obligations to evidence the borrowing under any bond act, the local governmental unit may, subject to the applicable loan agreement and with the approval of the agency, issue notes to the agency in anticipation of the loan. The issuance of the notes shall be governed by the provisions of this chapter relating to the issue of bonds other than notes, to the extent applicable, provided the maturity date of the notes shall not exceed five (5) years from the date of issue of the notes, or the expected date of completion of the approved project financed thereby as determined by the department, if later. Notes issued for less than the maximum maturity date may be renewed by the issue of other notes maturing no later than the maximum maturity date.

A local governmental unit may issue local governmental obligations to refund or pay at maturity or earlier redemption any local governmental obligations outstanding under any loan agreement, or to refund or pay any other debt of the local governmental unit issued to finance the approved project to which the loan agreement pertains. The refunding local governmental obligations may be issued in sufficient amounts to pay or provide for the principal of the obligations refunded, any redemption premium thereon, any interest accrued and to accrue to the date of payment of the obligations, the costs of issuance of the refunding obligations and any reserves required by the applicable loan agreement. The issue of refunding local governmental obligations, the amount and dates of maturity or maturities of local governmental obligations, the amount and dates of maturity or maturities and other details thereof, the security therefor, and the rights, duties, and obligations of the local governmental unit in respect to the same shall be governed by the provisions of this chapter relating to the issue of local governmental obligations other than refunding obligations as this chapter may be applicable.

Except as otherwise provided in §

46-12.8-9

, the applicable bond act, or by agreement between the agency and a local governmental unit, all local governmental obligations issued in accordance with this section shall be general obligations of the local governmental unit issuing the obligations for which its full faith and credit are pledged and for the payment of which all taxable property in the local governmental unit shall be subject to ad valorem taxation without limit as to rate or amount except as otherwise provided by law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 313, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 396, § 1.

46-12.8-9.
Power of local governmental units to issue limited obligations payable from drinking water system revenues.

If required by the applicable loan agreement, and notwithstanding any general or special law, municipal charter, ordinance or local law to the contrary, local governmental obligations may be authorized and issued as limited obligations payable solely from drinking water system revenues pledged to their payment in accordance with §

46-12.8-10

. Notwithstanding §

45-12-2

or any general or special law, municipal charter, ordinance or local law to the contrary, all local governmental units shall have the power to authorize and issue local governmental obligations payable solely from drinking water system revenues pursuant to this section without limit as to amount, and the amount of principal and premium, if any, and interest on the obligations shall not be included in the computation of any limit on the indebtedness of the local governmental unit or on the total taxes which may be levied or assessed by the local governmental unit in any year or on any assessment, levy, or other charge made by the local governmental unit on any other political subdivision or instrumentality of the state. Limited obligations shall be authorized by the affirmative vote of the legislative body of the local governmental unit, notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law, municipal charter, ordinance or local law requiring further approval of general obligations of the local governmental unit and this chapter shall constitute the bond act for the authorization and issuance of the local governmental obligations payable solely from drinking water system revenues by local governmental units. Any local governmental obligations issued in accordance with this section that are payable solely from drinking water system revenues shall recite on their face that they are limited obligations payable solely from drinking water system revenues pledged to their payment and that they are not secured by a pledge of the full faith and credit of the local governmental unit.

The authorization, issuance and sale of local governmental obligations in accordance with this section, the maturity or maturities and other terms of the obligations, the security for the obligations, the rights of the holders of the obligations, and the rights, duties, and obligations of the local governmental unit in respect of the same, and the form details and manner of sale of the obligations shall be governed by the provisions of this chapter relating to local governmental obligations generally to the extent applicable and not inconsistent with this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 313, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 396, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 359, § 1.